Kentucky statutes. TITLE XV Roads, Waterways, And Aviation
CHAPTER 179 County Road Engineer and Maintenance of Public Roads

179.010.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“County roads” are as defined in KRS

178.010

.

“County engineer” means county road engineer.

“Obstructions” includes any object which prevents the easy, safe and convenient use of a county road for public travel.

History.

4308-2, 4338: amend. Acts 1962, ch. 162, § 1; 1964, ch. 68, § 3.

179.020.
County road engineer or supervisor.

The county judge/executive of each county, with the consent of the fiscal court, may employ a county road engineer. Any person so employed shall be either a civil or highway engineer licensed in accordance with KRS Chapter 322, or a person who successfully passed an examination for county road engineer under this section prior to March 24, 1950, and who qualified and served as such.

If the fiscal court does not provide for a county road engineer, the duties of the county road engineer, except insofar as they may be in conflict with the provisions of KRS Chapter 322, shall be performed by a county road supervisor, who shall be employed by the county judge/executive with the consent of the fiscal court, and who may be removed in the same manner provided for county road engineers. No person shall be employed as county road supervisor unless he meets the following requirements:

He has at least three (3) years’ practical road building experience of a nature satisfactory to examining authorities selected by the Department of Highways for the Commonwealth of Kentucky; and

He has passed an examination, either oral or written, or both, given by the examining authorities, and has received a certificate of qualification from the authorities.

The county surveyor may be employed as county road engineer, if qualified under subsection (1) of this section, or as county road supervisor if qualified under subsection (2) of this section, and for his services as engineer or supervisor he shall receive a salary in addition to fees allowed by law for his services as county surveyor.

When no qualified applicant who is acceptable to the fiscal court is available for employment, the county judge/executive, with the consent of the fiscal court, may employ a temporary supervisor not qualified under subsection (2) of this section for a period of three (3) months, but in no event shall a temporary supervisor be used for more than three (3) months during any one (1) term of a county judge/executive.

This section shall not be construed to prohibit the supervision of the construction and maintenance of roads, without additional compensation, by the county judge/executive, or by committees of the fiscal court, in counties where the position of road engineer or road supervisor has not been established by the fiscal court.

Two (2) or more counties, by a contract approved by order of the fiscal court of each of the counties, may authorize the county judges/executive of the contracting counties to employ the same employee as county road engineer or county road supervisor to serve in all counties so contracting, and for the apportionment of the amount of his salary to be paid by each county.

The period of employment for any county road engineer or county road supervisor shall be two (2) or four (4) years, in the discretion of the fiscal court, beginning with the second Tuesday in January of an odd-numbered year. Other terms of employment, and the salaries of all persons employed under the provisions of this section, shall be fixed by the fiscal court.

Those persons serving as a county road engineer or supervisor on July 15, 1998, shall continue to serve in that capacity until the second Tuesday in January of 1999, at which time the position of county road engineer or supervisor shall be reappointed for a period of employment as provided in subsection (7) of this section.

History.

4325: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 31; 1966, ch. 255, § 165; 1998, ch. 418, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

179.030.
County engineer in counties of 200,000 population. [Repealed.]

179.040.
County engineer — Office — Supplies — Records to be turned over to successors.

The county engineer shall have a properly furnished and equipped office at the county seat of his county.

The fiscal court shall furnish the county road engineer and his employees in the county with all necessary books, stationery and printed forms for the records and uses of their offices.

Each county engineer shall deliver the books, accounts and papers pertaining to his office to his successor at the expiration of his term of office.

History.

4325, 4356g, 4356h.

179.050.
Transportation of engineer — When fiscal court to furnish.

In all counties levying a road tax amounting to over fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), the fiscal court shall, and in other counties the fiscal court may, furnish the county engineer with transportation in performing duties connected with the superintending, construction, repair and maintenance of roads in the county. For this purpose the fiscal court may purchase or rent teams or automobiles which may be used by the county judge/executive or committees of the fiscal court or board of commissioners for inspection of the roads to determine recommendations for needed work and repairs.

History.

4325, 4356v-3.

179.060.
Removal of engineer — Filling of vacancy.

The county judge/executive may remove the county engineer, appointed under KRS

179.020

, at any time for incompetency, malfeasance or misfeasance in office upon written charges after a hearing of which ten (10) days’ notice shall be given by serving a copy of the charges upon the county engineer. The hearing shall be at the courthouse, in the county seat.

If upon the hearing the charges are sustained, the county judge/executive shall remove the county engineer and immediately notify him by mail of his removal. The notice shall state specifically the grounds for removal. The record of the proceedings shall be filed in the office of the county clerk.

Within ten (10) days after the removal, the county judge/executive, with the consent of the fiscal court, shall appoint a county engineer to fill the vacancy caused by the removal. The person so appointed shall hold office for the unexpired term or until a final order of a court of competent jurisdiction determines that the original county engineer was wrongfully and illegally removed and directs his reinstatement.

History.

4326.

179.070.
General powers and duties of engineer — Requirement of site development plan in certain counties.

The county engineer shall:

Have general charge of all county roads and bridges within the county;

See that county roads and bridges are improved and maintained as provided by law;

Supervise the construction and maintenance of county roads and bridges and other work of like nature undertaken by the fiscal court or a consolidated local government;

Make reports as the county, consolidated local government, or fiscal court directs;

Advise and direct employees of contractors how best to repair, maintain, and improve county roads and bridges;

Examine the various formations and deposits of gravel and stone in the county to ascertain the materials most available and best suited for the improvement of roads therein, and, when requested by the Department of Highways, submit samples of materials and deposits and make a written report concerning the materials;

Establish or cause to be established necessary grades and recommend means of drainage, repair, and improvement;

Together with the fiscal court or consolidated local government, consider and either reject or approve plans, specifications, and estimates submitted for the erection or repair of bridges and the construction or maintenance of county roads;

Inspect or cause to be inspected each county road or bridge during its construction or improvement, and certify to the fiscal court or the consolidated local government the progress of the work and whether or not the work is being done according to the contract, plans, and specifications prepared therefor. If the work is not being done in accordance with the contract, plans, and specifications, the county engineer may stop any further work thereunder until the fiscal court or consolidated local government has inspected and passed upon it;

Remove trees or other obstacles from the right-of-way of any publicly dedicated road when the tree or other obstacles become a hazard to traffic;

Make recommendation to municipal authorities in a county containing a city with a population equal to or greater than twenty thousand (20,000) based upon the most recent federal decennial census, the mayor in a consolidated local government, or the county judge/executive of a county containing a city with a population equal to or greater than twenty thousand (20,000) based upon the most recent federal decennial census for the establishment of speed limits in accordance with the powers granted to municipal authorities, consolidated local governments, and the county judge/executive by KRS 189.390(5)(a), and make recommendations to the county judge/executive or consolidated local government for the establishment of parking restrictions by the county judge/executive or consolidated local government in accordance with KRS 189.390(5)(c); and

Make engineering and traffic investigations and make recommendations based thereupon to the fiscal court of counties containing a city with a population equal to or greater than twenty thousand (20,000) based upon the most recent federal decennial census or a consolidated local government for the adoption of traffic regulations for any publicly dedicated road in unincorporated portions of the county or for any road made a portion of a county through road system, established in accordance with KRS

178.330

or

178.333

, or both, in any manner reasonably calculated to promote the safety and convenience of the traveling public and to protect and preserve the roads and streets. The fiscal court or consolidated local government may adopt regulations which may include but not be limited to the establishment on roads designated in the first sentence of this subsection, of traffic lanes, the installation or removal of electric signals and other signs and markers, the removal of traffic bumps, the limitation or prohibition of parking, and the regulation or prohibition of a size or weight deemed likely to impede traffic or injure the streets; provided, however, that if such regulation of size and weight of vehicles conflicts with state regulations, the latter shall prevail. Nothing herein shall be construed to prevent the fiscal court or consolidated local government from contracting with city authorities for the joint installation of signs, markers, and electric signals and for their maintenance.

In counties containing a city of the first class or consolidated local government, or when authorized by ordinance of the fiscal court of a county containing a city with a population equal to or greater than twenty thousand (20,000) based upon the most recent federal decennial census, having the services of a county engineer, every person, subdivider, builder, contractor, or developer of any construction project shall submit to the county engineer for his written approval a site development plan providing for the proper drainage of surface water from the development or construction site so as to prevent flooding of property in the area. If the proposed site plan does not adequately provide for such drainage, the county engineer shall order such changes as necessary before approving the site plan.

History.

4238: amend. Acts 1964, ch. 80, § 8; 1972, ch. 348, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(1); 1978, ch. 384, § 316, effective June 17, 1978; 1990, ch. 261, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 143, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 2002, ch. 346, § 191, effective July 15, 2002; 2014, ch. 92, § 252, effective January 1, 2015.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(9/2/92). The internal numbering of this statute has been changed by the Reviser of Statutes acting under KRS 7.136(1).

179.080.
County road precincts. [Repealed.]

179.090.
Overseer for road precinct; appointment; exempt from road poll tax. [Repealed.]

179.100.
Duties of overseer. [Repealed.]

179.110.
Employment and compensation of county road employes. [Repealed.]

179.120.
Fiscal court may require men to work on roads; compensation. [Repealed.]

179.130.
Payment of money in lieu of road work. [Repealed.]

179.140.
County roads to be divided into sections. [Repealed.]

179.150.
Engineer to request contractors to put their sections in repair — Duty of engineer when contractor fails.

If any citizen of a road precinct complains to the county engineer, that any contractor has failed to keep his section of road in repair in accordance with the specifications, the county engineer shall cause examinations to be made within five (5) days after the complaint has been made and if upon examination he deems the complaint well founded, he shall give written notice to the party complained of, requesting him to put his section in repair according to the specifications within a reasonable time.

If the contractor fails to obey the request, the county engineer shall cause the road to be put in repair, and the cost of the repair shall be deducted from any money allowed the contractor for opening and keeping in repair the section. The fiscal court shall issue a warrant on the treasurer for the money certified, in favor of the persons employed to put the section in repair. If the amount under the control of the court is not sufficient to pay for the repairs, then the additional cost shall be recoverable from the contractor by the county engineer as other claims of equal amount are recoverable by law.

History.

4332.

179.160.
Engineer not to employ relatives — Reports to fiscal court.

No county engineer shall employ as a laborer on the public roads, his father, son, son-in-law, grandson, brother, brother-in-law, nephew, or first cousin by blood.

On January 1 and July 1 and at such other times as the fiscal court or the county judge/executive requires, the county engineer shall present a full itemized statement of the expenditures made by him since his last report, giving number and names of employees and number of horses employed by him, the time each was employed, the amount paid to and for each, and such other matter as he deems necessary or the court requires. Statements of account shall be prepared according to the public accounting laws of the state, and be certified to by the agent of the county engineer having charge of the work.

History.

4331: amend. Acts 1978, ch. 384, § 317, effective June 17, 1978.

179.170.
Fiscal court may purchase machinery — Engineer to care for road machinery. [Repealed.]

179.180.
Engineer may lease or hire machinery.

With the approval of the fiscal court the county engineer may lease or hire stone crushers, road rollers, traction engines and other road machinery. The expense thereof shall be paid by the fiscal court as other such claims are paid by it out of the road fund for the repair and improvement of the public roads of the county.

History.

4336.

179.190.
Engineer may acquire gravel and stone and natural sources thereof. [Repealed.]

179.200.
Engineer to inspect roads and bridges, remove stones and weeds, record description of roads and construct foot bridges. [Repealed.]

179.210.
Removal of obstructions by contractor or engineer — Repair of bridges — Payment of cost.

When a county road is suddenly obstructed or a county bridge becomes unsafe, if it is under contract for continuous maintenance as provided in KRS

178.140

, the county engineer shall immediately notify the contractor on whose section of road the obstruction occurs, and within twenty-four (24) hours or as soon as practicable thereafter, such contractor shall remove the obstruction. If the contractor makes no effort to remove the obstruction within twenty-four (24) hours, the county engineer shall immediately employ necessary persons, machinery and teams, and without avoidable delay, cause the obstruction to be removed from the public road, or the bridge to be made safe. The cost of removal shall be recoverable from the contractor, as provided in KRS

179.150

. But if the section of obstructed road is not under contract, the county road engineer shall immediately remove the obstructions in like manner, and the cost thereof shall be paid by the fiscal court out of the county road fund.

History.

4334.

179.220.
Fiscal court may order weeds, shrubs and overhanging branches to be removed — Hedges to be trimmed.

When ordered by the fiscal court, every owner and manager of lands bordering on the public roads shall clear away and carry from alongside the roads, all bushes, weeds, shrubs and overhanging limbs of trees and other obstructions, and keep all hedge fences along the road so trimmed that they at no time will become more than five (5) feet high.

History.

4342a-1.

179.230.
When removal to be made — Notice of requirements to be published.

The brush, bushes, weeds, overhanging limbs of trees and all other obstructions along the roads shall be removed between July 1 and August 20 of each year, and the county engineer shall publish in some county paper for at least two (2) consecutive weeks before July 1 of every year, in the manner provided in KRS Chapter 424, the requirements of KRS

179.220

and of this section and the order of the fiscal court.

The cost of the publication required by subsection (1) of this section shall be paid by the fiscal court of the county in which the notices were published and posted.

History.

4342a-2, 4342a-4: amend. Acts 1970, ch. 92, § 57.

179.240.
Owner to remove obstructions — Dead trees not to be left standing near roads.

The owner or occupant of land situated along a public road shall remove from the right-of-way, all obstructions, including fences and buildings, which have been placed there either by himself or by his consent.

No person shall kill a tree and leave it standing within fifty (50) feet of any public road.

History.

4339, 4343.

179.250.
Poles and wires not to obstruct roads.

Telephone, telegraph, electric railway or other electrical companies shall remove and reset poles and wires when they obstruct the use of public roads.

History.

4340.

179.260.
Pipelines not to obstruct roads.

Pipeline companies whose lines have been laid across or along any public road shall fill up all excavations made by them and shall make the public road in all respects as good as it was before the excavation was made, and keep it in such condition.

History.

4341.

179.265.
Cost of relocating utility facilities paid by public.

The cost of relocating any utility facilities originally constructed on other than public right of way required to be moved in the reconstruction or improvement of a public road shall be borne by the Department of Highways in the case of a road on the state system of highways, or by the public agency having jurisdiction over that public road and sponsoring the reconstruction or improvement.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 108, § 4.

179.270.
Engineer to remove obstructions when owner fails.

If the obstructions are not removed or reset, or if the excavations are not properly filled and maintained, within thirty (30) days after the service of a notice by the county engineer personally or by mail upon the owner or occupant or upon the company at its principal place of business, or an agent of the company within the county, requesting the removal or resetting, the county engineer shall cause the obstructions to be removed or reset and such repairs on the excavation to be made as may be necessary to place the road in its original condition. The expenses thereby incurred shall be paid in the first instance out of the money levied and collected and available therefor, and shall be charged against the owner or occupant and levied and collected as provided in KRS

179.280

.

History.

4341.

179.280.
Procedure for assessing cost when engineer removes obstructions — Collection and disposition of charges.

Before assessing the costs of removing obstructions or resetting poles and wires as provided in KRS

179.240

to

179.270

, the county engineer shall serve personally, or by mail, upon the owner or occupant, a written notice, stating that at the time and place specified therein, he or his agent will assess the costs against the owner or occupant neglecting to remove the obstruction or reset the poles and wires. The notice shall be served at least ten (10) days before the time of the assessment. If directed against a corporation, it may be served upon it at its principal place of business or upon any agent within the district or county. At the time and place specified the road engineer shall hear the parties interested and shall thereupon complete the assessment, stating therein the name of the owner or occupant and the amount assessed against him. The county engineer shall return the assessment to the fiscal court of the county and the court shall cause the amount to be levied against the owner or occupant, and any uncollected assessment shall be a lien upon the property affected. The amount levied shall be collected as other taxes levied by the court, and shall be paid into the county road fund to be applied to reimbursing the fund from which the cost was defrayed.

History.

4342.

179.290.
Railroad companies not to obstruct county roads.

Every railroad company, including traction line companies, which obstructs any public road, shall as far as possible put the road so obstructed in as good condition at every crossing of the railroad as it was before the obstruction, within six (6) months after the completion of the construction, repair or use of the railroad.

History.

4350.

179.300.
Engineer may enter private lands to prevent flooding of roads.

The county road engineer may enter upon any of the lands adjacent to any public road for the purpose of opening any existing ditch or drain, or for digging a new ditch or drain for the free passage of water for the drainage of public roads. He may enter upon land adjoining streams to drive piles, throw up embankments, or to perform any other work necessary to keep the streams within their proper channels, and to prevent their encroachment upon public roads or abutments of bridges. He may also enter upon the lands adjoining a public road, which during the time of high water is subject to overflow from streams to remove or change the position of a fence or other obstructions, preventing the free flow of water under or through a bridge or culvert whenever it is necessary for the protection of a public road or bridge.

History.

4352.

179.310.
Payment of damages for engineer’s entry upon private lands.

When lands are entered upon under the provisions of KRS

179.300

, the county engineer may agree with the owner of the lands subject to the approval of the fiscal court, as to the amount of damages sustained by the owner because of the entry, and the amount of damages shall be paid by the fiscal court out of the county road fund.

If the county engineer is unable to agree with the owner upon the amount of the damages, the amount shall be determined and paid in the manner provided in KRS

178.110

.

History.

4353.

179.320.
Erection of guideboards on county roads.

When authorized or directed by the fiscal court, the county engineer shall cause guideboards to be made and placed at each intersection of a county road with another county road or with a state highway. The guideboard shall indicate the direction and distance to the county seat or other noted places to which the road leads. The letters and figures on the guideboards shall be sufficiently large and distinct to be read from a distance of forty (40) feet, and the boards shall not be placed closer than five (5) miles apart.

All expenses connected with the erection of such guideboards shall be paid by the fiscal court out of the county levy.

History.

4334, 4353a-1, 4353a-3.

179.330.
Names of county roads — How changed and established — Erection of signs.

Every county road shall be known by the name by which it was designated on the map or plat or record in the office of the county clerk of the county in which it is located or by the order of the court establishing the road, or by the deed conveying the right-of-way for the road to the county.

When the name of any road has been designated as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the name of the road can only be changed by an order of the county judge/executive or the mayor of a consolidated local government. Such order may be issued on a petition and proceeding in which fifty percent (50%) or more of the property owners abutting upon the road have joined in the petition or have been summoned for a hearing upon the petition by the county judge/executive or the mayor of a consolidated local government at a day and time designated for the hearing or in counties containing a city of the first class or consolidated local government upon the recommendation of the county engineer and of the planning and zoning commission. On similar proceeding an order may be issued designating a name for any unnamed road in the county.

The fiscal court or a consolidated local government may cause signs bearing the name of each road as fixed by the county judge/executive or the mayor of a consolidated local government, to be placed on the roads, or it may, by a resolution duly recorded, authorize any person or organization to erect signs, approved as to form by the fiscal court or a consolidated local government, bearing the name designated to the road by the county judge/executive or the mayor of a consolidated local government.

No person or organization shall remove or damage any sign erected as hereinabove provided for, or erect or place or cause to be erected or placed, upon a road any sign or signs, indicating, marking, or designating a road by any other name than as hereinabove provided for.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the Department of Highways from designating roads built under the supervision of the Department of Highways, either by name or number.

History.

4324-1, 4324-2: amend. Acts 1964, ch. 80, § 9; 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(1); 1978, ch. 384, § 319, effective June 17, 1978; 2002, ch. 346, § 192, effective July 15, 2002.

179.340.
Planting of shade trees along roads — Care of shade trees. [Repealed.]

179.350.
Roads to be measured by engineer — Report.

When directed to do so by the Department of Highways, the county engineer shall cause all public roads within his county to be measured. Measurement shall be made either by the use of the cyclometer or otherwise as directed. The report on the measurement shall indicate the roads which have been surfaced with gravel, those which have been surfaced with crushed stone, brick, concrete, or other hard materials, and those which have been shaped and crowned, and the mileage of all roads.

History.

4356a.

179.360.
Engineer to examine toll bridges — Owner to repair bridge — Engineer to repair bridge when owner fails.

Whenever complaint in writing, on oath, is made to the county engineer that a privately owned toll bridge in the county is unsafe for public use, the county engineer shall immediately cause an examination of the bridge to be made, and if he finds that the bridge is unsafe for public use, he shall immediately notify the owner of the toll bridge or an agent of the owner that he has carefully examined the bridge on complaint and found it unsafe for public use. The owner shall immediately commence repairing the bridge and cause the necessary repairs to be made within one (1) week from the day the notice is given, or within reasonable time thereafter. No toll shall be charged for the use of the bridge until it is fully repaired.

When the owner fails to repair the bridge as provided in subsection (1) of this section, the county engineer shall cause the repairs to be made and the owners of the bridge shall be liable for the expense thereof and for the services of a foreman at three dollars ($3) per day, and upon the neglect or refusal to pay such expenses upon presentation of any account thereof, the county engineer may recover expenses by action in the name of the county.

History.

4356c.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Construction and repair of joint bridges, KRS

178.250

to

178.270

.

179.370.
Closing of roads and bridges for repairs — Temporary roads.

If it appears necessary to close a county road or bridge which is being constructed or repaired, the county engineer shall execute a notice in duplicate, stating the necessity for closing the road or bridge, and describing the portion to be closed. He shall cause a copy of the notice to be posted at each end of the portion of the road or bridge to be closed, and shall close such portion to travel by erecting suitable obstructions and posting conspicuous notices to the effect that it is closed. Not more than one (1) mile of any county road shall be closed at one (1) time.

The county engineer shall provide a new location for constructing a temporary road to be used in lieu of the closed road, and may erect temporary bridges when necessary. For the purposes of locating or constructing the temporary road or bridge, the county engineer may enter upon the lands adjoining or near the closed road, and may, with the approval of the fiscal court, agree with the owners of the lands as to the damages caused thereby.

If the county engineer is unable to agree with the owner upon the amount of damages sustained, the amount shall be ascertained and paid as provided in KRS

178.110

.

When a county road, or bridge, has been closed to the public as provided in this section, no person shall disregard the obstructions and notices and drive or ride over the portion of the road, or bridge, so closed.

History.

4356f.

179.375.
Acceptance of donations of roads and driveways to churches, cemeteries and schools.

All counties may accept donations in fee to roads and driveways used by the public in connection with churches, cemeteries and public school buildings. After such acceptance by any county, such roads and driveways shall become a part of the county road system and may be constructed, reconstructed and maintained in accordance with existing law.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 162, § 2.

179.380.
Approaches to be kept in repair by owner or tenant.

The owner or tenant of lands fronting on a public road shall construct and keep in repair all approaches or driveways to and from the public road under the direction of the county engineer.

No owner or tenant shall fill up any ditch or place anything in any ditch so as to interfere with the purposes for which it was made.

History.

4356b.

179.390.
Payment of claims for county road work — Engineer to present annual itemized account to fiscal court. [Repealed.]

179.400.
Counties receiving state aid — Fiscal court to appropriate money for road purposes — Contract or cooperative agreement with department for construction, reconstruction, and maintenance of county roads and bridges.

The fiscal court of any county receiving state aid shall appropriate sufficient money to keep all county roads in the county in good repair and free from obstructions. The cost of all repairs and removals of obstruction shall be paid by the treasurer of the county upon the order of the fiscal court, and all bills for repairs or for removal of obstructions shall be verified by affidavit, and shall be certified to be correct by the county engineer.

The fiscal court of any county receiving state aid may, if it deems proper, enter into contract or cooperative agreement with the Department of Rural and Municipal Aid for the construction, reconstruction, and maintenance of county roads and bridges selected by the fiscal court. Any contract or cooperative agreement shall designate those roads which the department shall be required to construct, reconstruct, or maintain and shall not be in excess of the projected county allotment for any one (1) fiscal year. The county shall not be responsible for payment to the department of any costs not specified with the contract or cooperative agreement.

History.

4356t-14: amend. Acts 1984, ch. 350, § 8, effective July 13, 1984; 2005, ch. 98, § 11, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 13, § 14, effective June 25, 2009.

179.410.
Allocation of funds appropriated to counties.

The Department for Local Government shall allocate the sum appropriated by the General Assembly from the funds arising under the provisions of KRS 177.320(2), for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, and maintenance of county roads and bridges in accordance with the provisions of KRS 177.360(1).

History.

4308-2: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 105; 1946, ch. 174; 1964, ch. 10, § 1; 1974, ch. 291, § 2; 1980, ch. 218, § 13, effective July 1, 1980; 1984, ch. 350, § 9, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 374, § 12, effective July 15, 1986; 1998, ch. 69, § 67, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 47, § 84, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 80, effective July 15, 2010.

179.415.
Payment of pro rata share of funds appropriated to counties.

On and after the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1980, and each fiscal year thereafter, the Department for Local Government shall pay to each county its pro rata share of any funds appropriated and any unexpended balance of funds appropriated for construction, reconstruction, improvement, and maintenance of county roads and bridges. During each fiscal year, the Department for Local Government shall make quarterly payments to each such county of the funds allocated in accordance with KRS

177.369

.

The expenditure of any money received by the county in accordance with the provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall be made solely for the purpose of construction, reconstruction, improvement, and maintenance of county roads and bridges.

Any county which has received any money in accordance with the provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall retain all records of the expenditure of the money for a period of five (5) years and said records shall be subject to audit by the Department for Local Government for said period of time in order to determine the proper expenditure of said money for the purpose required by KRS

179.410

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1980, ch. 218, § 14, effective July 1, 1980; 1986, ch. 374, § 13, effective July 15, 1986; 1998, ch. 69, § 68, effective July 15, 1998; 2007, ch. 47, § 85, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 81, effective July 15, 2010.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A county’s pro rata share of road funds paid by the department of finance (now Finance and Administration Cabinet) may be expended, as applied to county roads and bridges and county urban roads and bridges, for labor, materials purchased, equipment purchased and equipment which the fiscal court finds it necessary to rent for one or more specific road projects.

OAG 80-252

.

Since no state road equipment purchased by the division of equipment, bureau (now department) of highways had been bought with county road funds, and since there was no agreement on the part of the state to transfer any equipment used on county roads to the counties, and because there is no statute providing for that, there is no legal basis for transferring state road equipment used on county roads to the counties.

OAG 80-356

.

179.420.
Use of state money appropriated to counties — Joint plans. [Repealed.]

179.430.
Department of highways to direct expenditures — Prescribe rules. [Repealed.]

179.440.
Counties may spend county road funds.

Nothing in KRS

179.410

and

179.415

shall prohibit any county from spending county road funds for the further and additional maintenance, reconstruction and improvement of county roads.

History.

4308-6.

179.450.
Engineer to bring actions for county. [Repealed.]

179.460.
Engineer not to influence voters.

No county engineer shall directly or indirectly influence or attempt to influence any voter in any election in the casting of his vote.

History.

4356n.

Opinions of Attorney General.

This section in prohibiting a county road engineer from directly or indirectly influencing or attempting to influence any voter in any state, county or district election in the casting of his vote for or against any candidate in effect prohibits a county road engineer from running for any elective office.

OAG 77-18

.